North Dakota, session 69, HB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
department of public instruction, the center for distance education, the state library, the school for the
deaf, and North Dakota vision services - school for the blind for the purpose of defraying the expenses
of those agencies, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $19,964,765 $1,121,603 $21,086,368
New and vacant FTE pool 0 695,495 695,495
Operating expenses 32,793,320 10,618,819 43,412,139
Integrated formula payments 2,299,674,851 114,602,852 2,414,277,703
Grants - special education 24,000,000 (2,000,000) 22,000,000
Grants - transportation 58,100,000 2,000,000 60,100,000
Grants - other grants 382,738,893 29,705,709 412,444,602
Grants - program grants 17,205,000 8,511,027 25,716,027
Grants - passthrough grants 3,569,000 1,166,000 4,735,000
PowerSchool 5,775,000 (5,775,000) 0
Student information systems 0 5,775,000 5,775,000
National board certification 176,290 0 176,290
Total all funds $2,843,997,119 $166,421,505 $3,010,418,624
Less other funds 1,115,246,674 187,164,012 1,302,410,686
Total general fund $1,728,750,445 ($20,742,507) $1,708,007,938
Full-time equivalent positions 86.25 0.00 86.25
Subdivision 2.
CENTER FOR DISTANCE EDUCATION
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Center for distance education $11,613,483 $3,066,477 $14,679,960
New and vacant FTE pool 0 203,156 203,156
Total all funds $11,613,483 $3,269,633 $14,883,116

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 2
Less other funds 4,550,000 2,074,000 6,624,000
Total general fund $7,063,483 $1,195,633 $8,259,116
Full-time equivalent positions 30.80 0.20 31.00
Subdivision 3.
STATE LIBRARY
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $4,615,731 $500,120 $5,115,851
New and vacant FTE pool 0 107,552 107,552
Operating expenses 2,282,298 707,777 2,990,075
Grants 2,283,528 0 2,283,528
Total all funds $9,181,557 $1,315,449 $10,497,006
Less other funds 2,499,073 305,139 2,804,212
Total general fund $6,682,484 $1,010,310 $7,692,794
Full-time equivalent positions 26.75 0.00 26.75
Subdivision 4.
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $9,283,599 $735,225 $10,018,824
New and vacant FTE pool 0 415,571 415,571
Operating expenses 1,705,586 320,839 2,026,425
Capital assets 158,678 283,800 442,478
Total all funds $11,147,863 $1,755,435 $12,903,298
Less other funds 2,811,557 360,186 3,171,743
Total general fund $8,336,306 $1,395,249 $9,731,555
Full-time equivalent positions 45.36 1.50 46.86
Subdivision 5.
NORTH DAKOTA VISION SERVICES - SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $5,538,818 $241,078 $5,779,896
New and vacant FTE pool 0 259,436 259,436
Operating expenses 869,686 406,571 1,276,257
Capital assets 39,192 230,808 270,000
Total all funds $6,447,696 $1,137,893 $7,585,589
Less other funds 1,206,705 534,239 1,740,944
Total general fund $5,240,991 $603,654 $5,844,645
Full-time equivalent positions 27.75 1.00 28.75
Subdivision 6.
TOTAL - SECTION 1
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $2,882,387,718 $173,899,915 $3,056,287,633
Less grand total other funds 1,126,314,009 190,437,576 1,316,751,585
Grand total general fund $1,756,073,709 ($16,537,661) $1,739,536,048

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 3
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in each entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which each entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth
legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total Funds
Department of Pubic Instruction
Teacher retention program $0 $2,000,000 $2,000,000
School board training 0 1,500,000 1,500,000
Early learning program 0 1,500,000 1,500,000
Centers of excellence 0 1,000,000 1,000,000
Native American essential 0 950,000 950,000
understandings and book series
Statewide reading tool 0 500,000 500,000
Dyslexia training 0 300,000 300,000
Total department of public instruction $0 $7,750,000 $7,750,000
Center for Distance Education
Information technology equipment $0 $25,000 $25,000
Student information system upgrade 75,250 0 75,250
Total center for distance education $75,250 $25,000 $100,250
School for the Deaf
Equipment replacement $0 $45,000 $45,000
Campus security upgrades 0 238,800 238,800
Total school for the deaf $0 $283,800 $283,800
North Dakota vision services - School for the Blind
Equipment less than $5,000 $0 $28,000 $28,000
Door replacement 0 10,000 10,000
Breakroom remodel 0 55,000 55,000
Tractor replacement 0 55,000 55,000
South parking lot replacement 0 150,000 150,000
Total school for the blind $0 $298,000 $298,000
Grand total $75,250 $8,356,800 $8,432,050
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
department of public instruction, center for distance education, state library, school for the deaf, and
North Dakota vision services - school for the blind may not spend funds appropriated in the new and
vacant FTE pool line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget
to transfer funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item or the
center for distance education line item within each respective subdivision in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - 2023-25 BIENNIUM - CONTRACT REIMBURSEMENTS. There
is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated,
the sum of $500,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public
instruction for the purpose of providing contract reimbursements, for the period beginning with the
effective date of this section, and ending June 30, 2025. The department of public instruction may use
up to $500,000 to reimburse vendors for services related to federal elementary and secondary school
emergency relief fund contracts which have been denied payment by the United States department of
education. Reimbursement may be made only for services provided through May 2, 2025.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - TUITION APPORTIONMENT. The sum of $595,677,350, included
in the integrated formula payments line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act, is from the state
tuition fund in the state treasury. Any additional amount in the state tuition fund that becomes available
for distribution to public schools is appropriated to the department of public instruction for that purpose,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 4
SECTION 6. OTHER FUNDS - FOUNDATION AID STABILIZATION FUND. The other funds line
item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $233,000,000 from the foundation aid
stabilization fund for integrated formula payments.
SECTION 7. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $6,250,000 from the
strategic investment and improvements fund for one-time program grants, relating to dyslexia training, a
statewide reading tool, a teacher retention program, a centers of excellence program, school board
training, and a native American essential understandings program and book series.
SECTION 8. INTEGRATED FORMULA PAYMENTS AND SPECIAL EDUCATION CONTRACTS
EXPENDITURE AUTHORITY. The superintendent of public instruction may expend funds included in
the integrated formula payments and grants - special education contracts line items in subdivision 1 of
section 1 of this Act for paying grants for educational services that were due in the 2023-25 biennium
but which were not filed, claimed, or properly supported by the education provider until after June 30,
2025. To be reimbursed under this section, claims must be properly supported and filed with the
superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 2026.
SECTION 9. GIFTED AND TALENTED PROGRAM. The sum of $800,000, included in the
integrated formula payments line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act, must be distributed to
reimburse school districts or special education units for gifted and talented programs upon the
submission of an application that is approved in accordance with guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall encourage
cooperative efforts for gifted and talented programs among school districts and special education units.
SECTION 10. MEDICAID MATCHING FUNDING - WITHHOLDING AND DISTRIBUTION. State
school aid payments for special education must be reduced by the amount of matching funds required
to be paid by school districts or special education units for students participating in the Medicaid
program, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Special education funds
equal to the amount of the matching funds required to be paid by the school district or special education
unit must be paid by the superintendent of public instruction to the department of health and human
services on behalf of the school district or unit.
SECTION 11. REGIONAL EDUCATION ASSOCIATIONS - GRANTS - DISTRIBUTION. The
integrated formula payments line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act includes $600,000 from
the general fund for the purpose of providing annual grants to regional education associations, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. An annual grant of $50,000 is provided to
each regional education association that exists as of July 1, 2025. Regional education associations that
merge during the 2025-27 biennium are entitled to the annual grants that would have been paid to each
of the member associations.
SECTION 12. STUDENT MEALS - GRANTS - DISTRIBUTION. The grants - program grants line
item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act includes $6,000,000 from the general fund for the purpose
of providing grants to school districts to defray the expenses of providing meals, free of charge, for all
students enrolled in public or nonpublic school at or below two hundred twenty-five percent of the
federal poverty guideline, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop guidelines and reporting requirements for the grants.
SECTION 13. PARAPROFESSIONAL-TO-TEACHER PROGRAM - GRANTS - DISTRIBUTION.
The grants - program grants line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act includes $3,000,000 from
the general fund for the purpose of providing grants to accredited institutions of higher education to
assist paraprofessionals to become qualified teachers, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. The superintendent of public instruction may award up to $20,000 to each
qualifying institution for program startup and other administrative costs and the remainder of the
appropriation may be used only for tuition and scholarships for students enrolled in the program. The
superintendent of public instruction may establish policies and procedures to administer this program.

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 5
SECTION 14. NORTH DAKOTA GOVERNOR'S SCHOOLS - GRANTS - DISTRIBUTION. The
grants - passthrough grants line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act includes $500,000 from the
general fund for the purpose of providing grants for North Dakota governor's schools at North Dakota
state university and university of North Dakota, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.
1. The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct North Dakota governor's schools once a
summer alternating annually between North Dakota state university and university of North
Dakota.
2. The superintendent of public instruction shall award the grants based on providing an average
cost of $5,000 per student attending the schools each year not to exceed a total of $250,000
to each university for each year of the biennium.
3. The governor's schools program must provide programs related to science, technology,
engineering, mathematics, energy law, mental health, education, and health sciences.
4. The superintendent of public instruction shall name codirectors at each university to ensure
continued collaboration of the schools at both campuses.
5. Funds may be used only for defraying expenses for students while on campus, including
housing, dining, resident assistants, program directors, instructors, and faculty research
sponsors.
SECTION 15. EXEMPTION - INDIRECT COST RECOVERIES, GENERAL EDUCATIONAL
DEVELOPMENT FEES, AND DISPLACED HOMEMAKER DEPOSITS. Notwithstanding section
54-44.1-15, the department of public instruction may deposit indirect cost recoveries in its operating
account. In addition, any moneys collected by the department of public instruction for general
educational development fees and displaced homemakers deposits must be deposited in the public
instruction fund in the state treasury. Any funds deposited in the public instruction fund may only be
spent subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly.
SECTION 16. EXEMPTION - TRANSFER - PUBLIC INSTRUCTION FUND - TRANSFER -
GENERAL FUND. Notwithstanding section 54-44.1-11, if, after the superintendent of public instruction
complies with all statutory payment obligations imposed for the 2023-25 biennium, from any moneys
remaining in the integrated formula payments line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 45 of the
2023 Session Laws, the lesser of $11,000,000 or the remaining amount must be continued into the
2025-27 biennium and the office of management and budget shall transfer this amount into the public
instruction fund for the purpose of providing integrated formula payments as appropriated in
subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act. The superintendent of public instruction shall transfer any of these
funds remaining unspent at the end of the 2025-27 biennium to the general fund.
SECTION 17. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. The following appropriations to the department of public instruction are not subject to
the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027:
1. Any funds remaining from federal funds derived from the elementary and secondary school
emergency education relief fund and any other federal funds appropriated in subdivision 2 of
section 2 of chapter 28 of the 2021 Session Laws; and
2. Any funds remaining from special funds from the public instruction fund in the state treasury,
derived from reimbursements withheld from school districts' integrated formula payments for
the purpose of information technology project upgrades to the state automated reporting
system and the statewide longitudinal data system, appropriated in section 17 of chapter 549
of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws.

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 6
SECTION 18. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATION - STATE LIBRARY. The sum of
$150,000, appropriated from the general fund to the state library for building renovations in
subdivision 3 of section 1 of chapter 45 of the 2023 Session Laws, is not subject to the provisions of
section 54-44.1-11. Any unexpended funds from this appropriation are available for building renovations
during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 19. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS - SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF.
The sum of $800,000, appropriated from special funds, derived from trust fund distributions, rents, and
service revenue, to the school for the deaf for boiler replacement, pneumatic controls, and a fire alarm
system in subdivision 4 of section 1 of chapter 45 of the 2023 Session Laws, is not subject to the
provisions of section 54-44.1-11. Any unexpended funds from this appropriation are available for boiler
replacement, pneumatic controls, and a fire alarm system during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 20. STATE AID TO PUBLIC LIBRARIES. The grants line item in subdivision 3 of
section 1 of this Act includes $1,737,582 for aid to public libraries, of which no more than one-half may
be expended during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
SECTION 21. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-02-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-02-02. Salary.
The annual salary of the superintendent of public instruction is one hundred thirty-eight thousand
one hundred forty-two one hundred forty - seven thousand nine hundred seventy - eigh t dollars through
June 30, 20242026, and one hundred forty-three thousand six hundred sixty-eight one hundred fifty - two
thousand four hundred seventeen dollars thereafter.
SECTION 22. A new section to chapter 15.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Electronic collection of free or reduced-price meal eligibility information - Requirements.
1. Each school district shall annually provide an electronic form to all parents or guardians of
enrolled students to collect household income information necessary to determine eligibility for
free or reduced-price meals under the national school lunch program and other relevant
federal and state assistance programs.
2. The electronic form must be made available to all parents or guardians at the beginning of the
eligibility period or the beginning of each school year and must be designed to facilitate ease
of completion and submission.
3. A school district shall offer a paper form upon request of a parent or guardian who prefers a
nonelectronic submission method.
SECTION 23. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-27-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-27-16. Per student payments - Administrative cost-sharing - Cooperating districts and
special education units. (Effective through June 30, 2026)
1. If any school district receiving payments under this chapter cooperates with another school
district for the joint provision of educational services under a plan approved by the
superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent of public instruction shall,
notwithstanding the provisions of section 15.1-27-03.2, create and assign a separate
weighting factor that allows the cooperating districts to receive, for a period of four years, a
payment rate equivalent to that which each district would have received had the cooperative
plan not taken effect. The superintendent of public instruction shall compute the separate

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 7
weighting factor to four decimal places and that weighting factor is effective for the duration of
the cooperative plan.
2. A school district that is cooperating with another school district under a cooperative plan
approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and which has taxable property located
in the same city as the other school district under the cooperative plan, may not be required as
part of the cooperative plan to:
a. Provide unduplicated grade level services; or
b. Share administrative personnel.
3. If any school district in the state receiving payments under this chapter or any special
education unit in the state cooperates with another school district or special education unit to
jointly employ or contract with a superintendent or a school district business manager, or both,
or to jointly employ or contract with a special education unit director or a special education unit
business manager, or both, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide partial
reimbursement of the salary of the superintendent or the school district business manager, or
both, or partial reimbursement of the salary of the special education unit director or the special
education unit business manager, or both, as follows:
a. If the salary exceeds two hundred thousand dollars, the amount of the reimbursement
must be calculated based upon two hundred thousand dollars. Each cooperating school
district or special education unit shall receive a prorated share of the reimbursement
percentages listed below each year for four years. The prorated reimbursement is based
on the percentage of full-time equivalency that the superintendent or school district
business manager, or both, or the special education unit director or special education unit
business manager, or both, are employed or contracted by each district or special
education unit. The percentage of reimbursement for the salary of the jointly hired
superintendent or school district business manager, or both, or of the jointly hired special
education unit director or special education unit business manager, or both, must be as
follows:
(1) If two schools or special education units are cooperating, ten percent of the salary;
(2) If three schools or special education units are cooperating, fifteen percent of the
salary;
(3) If four schools or special education units are cooperating, twenty percent of the
salary; and
(4) If five or more schools or special education units are cooperating, twenty-five
percent of the salary.
b. To be eligible for reimbursement under this subsection, the cooperating school districts or
special education units must:
(1) Have been approved by the superintendent of public instruction and have
implemented their administrative cost-sharing program after June 30, 2022; and
(2) Submit the salary of the superintendent or school district business manager, or
both, or the salary of the special education unit director or special education unit
business manager, or both, to the superintendent of public instruction by June first
of each year.
Per student payments - Cooperating districts. (Effective after June 30, 2026)
1. If any school district receiving payments under this chapter cooperates with another school
district for the joint provision of educational services under a plan approved by the

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 8
superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent of public instruction shall,
notwithstanding the provisions of section 15.1-27-03.2, create and assign a separate
weighting factor that allows the cooperating districts to receive, for a period of four years, a
payment rate equivalent to that which each district would have received had the cooperative
plan not taken effect. The superintendent of public instruction shall compute the separate
weighting factor to four decimal places and that weighting factor is effective for the duration of
the cooperative plan.
2. A school district that is cooperating with another school district under a cooperative plan
approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and which has taxable property located
in the same city as the other school district under the cooperative plan, may not be required as
part of the cooperative plan to:
a. Provide unduplicated grade level services; or
b. Share administrative personnel.
SECTION 24. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 22 of this Act becomes effective July 1, 2026.

H. B. NO. 1013 - PAGE 9
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1013.
House Vote: Yeas 60 Nays 28 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State